dev/xfst2apertium.hashtags.twol
!! This file moves the +G3 tag after the +N tag, and turns
!    vuođđogeađggit  vuođđu+N+SgNomCmp#geađgi+N+Pl+Nom
!    vuođđogeađggit  vuođđo#geađgi+N+Pl+Nom
!! into
!    vuođđogeađggit  vuođđu+N+SgNomCmp#geađgi+N+Pl+Nom
!    vuođđogeađggit  vuođđogeađgi+N+Pl+Nom
!! and
!    sámegiela       sápmi+SgGenCmp+N+SgGenCmp#giella+N+Sg+Gen
!    sámegiela       sápmi+SgGenCmp+N+SgGenCmp#giella+N+Sg+Acc
!    sámegiela       sápmi+SgGenCmp+PlGenCmp+N+SgGenCmp#giella+N+Sg+Gen
!    sámegiela       sápmi+SgGenCmp+PlGenCmp+N+SgGenCmp#giella+N+Sg+Acc
!! into
!    sámegiela       sápmi+N+SgGenCmp#giella+N+Sg+Gen
!    sámegiela       sápmi+N+SgGenCmp#giella+N+Sg+Acc

Alphabet

 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q   ! small
 r s t u v w x y z å ä ö ø æ %-
 á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ë ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý þ ñ ð ß ª ß ç

 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q   ! capital
 R S T U V W X Y Z Å Ä Ö Ø Æ
 Á É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ë Ü Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý þ Ñ Ð

 č đ ŋ š ŧ ž          ! Sámi letters.
 Č Đ Ŋ Š Ŧ Ž          !

%#:0
%# ! Need this, since otherwise #-words not matched by our rule will disappear

%+Num 
%-
%:

%+Actor
%+N
%+A
%+Attr
%+V

%+N:%+N%*
%+A:%+A%*
%+Attr:%+Attr%*
%+V:%+V%*
%+SgNomCmp:%+SgNomCmp%*
%+SgGenCmp:%+SgGenCmp%*

%+LCmpnd%+
%+LCmpnd%+:0

%+Cmp
%+ShCmp
%+Cmpnd
%+SgCmp      	%+PlCmp
%+SgLeft      	%+PlLeft
%+SgNomCmp   	%+PlNomCmp
%+SgNomLeft  	%+PlNomLeft
%+SgGenCmp   	%+PlGenCmp
%+SgGenLeft  	%+PlGenLeft
%+DefSgGenCmp 	%+DefPlGenCmp

%+Cmpnd:0
%+SgCmp:0    	%+PlCmp:0
%+SgLeft:0    	%+PlLeft:0
%+SgNomCmp:0 	%+PlNomCmp:0
%+SgNomLeft:0  	%+PlNomLeft:0
%+SgGenCmp:0 	%+PlGenCmp:0
%+SgGenLeft:0  	%+PlGenLeft:0
%+DefSgGenCmp:0 %+DefPlGenCmp:0

 !! Stadieveksling
 %+G3

;


Sets

Alphabetic =
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q   ! small
 r s t u v w x y z å ä ö ø æ %-
 á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ë ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý þ ñ ð ß ª ß ç

 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q   ! capital
 R S T U V W X Y Z Å Ä Ö Ø Æ
 Á É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ë Ü Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý þ Ñ Ð

 č đ ŋ š ŧ ž          ! Sámi letters.
 Č Đ Ŋ Š Ŧ Ž          !
;

Cmptag = 
%+Cmp
%+ShCmp
%+Cmpnd
%+SgCmp      	%+PlCmp
%+SgLeft      	%+PlLeft
%+SgNomCmp   	%+PlNomCmp
%+SgNomLeft  	%+PlNomLeft
%+SgGenCmp   	%+PlGenCmp
%+SgGenLeft  	%+PlGenLeft
%+DefSgGenCmp 	%+DefPlGenCmp
;

RemCmptag = 			! don't remove Cmp and ShCmp
%+Cmpnd
%+LCmpnd%+
%+SgCmp      	%+PlCmp
%+SgLeft      	%+PlLeft
%+SgNomCmp   	%+PlNomCmp
%+SgNomLeft  	%+PlNomLeft
%+SgGenCmp   	%+PlGenCmp
%+SgGenLeft  	%+PlGenLeft
%+DefSgGenCmp 	%+DefPlGenCmp
;

RemWICmptag =
%+LCmpnd%+
;

KeepCmpAfter =			! could expand to include lemmas...
%+N
%+Actor
%+A
%+Attr
;


Unstarred =
%+N
%+A
%+Attr
%+V
%+SgNomCmp
%+SgGenCmp
;

Starred = 			! Remember to put them in relabel too!
%+N%*
%+A%*
%+Attr%*
%+V%*
%+SgNomCmp%*	 ! SgNomCmp is turned into <Sg*><Nom*><Cmp> in relabel
%+SgGenCmp%*	 ! SgGenCmp is turned into <Sg*><Gen*><Cmp> in relabel
;

Rules 


"#-deletion after alphabetic characters"
%#:0 <=> Alphabetic _ ;  

!! After inversion, we get
!    ^sámegiella/sápmi+N+SgGenCmp#giella+N+Sg+Nom/sáme#giella+N+Sg+Nom$
!! After this file, we get
!    ^sámegiella/sápmi+N+SgGenCmp#giella+N+Sg+Nom/sámegiella+N+Sg+Nom$
!! After substitution/relabelling, we get
!    ^sámegiella/sápmi<N><Sg><Gen><Cmp>+giella<N><Sg><Nom>/sámegiella<N><Sg><Nom>$
!! which after pretransfer turns into 
!    ^sápmi<N><Sg><Gen><Cmp>$ ^giella<N><Sg><Nom>$
!    ^sámegiella<N><Sg><Nom>$


"Delete compound tags (except Cmp/ShCmp) that weren't followed by an N or A tag"
Vr:0  <=>  \[ KeepCmpAfter: | 0:%+G3 ]  _  ; where Vr in RemCmptag;
!! We don't remove +Cmp or +ShCmp tags since they follow lemmas, not +N or +A:
!    mielbargin      miel+ShCmp#bargat+V+TV+Der2+Actor+N+Ess
!! The :? is needed since we may have eg. %+N:%+N%* there, also the
!! below rules can insert a +G3 after a +N or a +N*
!! Trond: Changed  KeepCmpAfter:? to  KeepCmpAfter: since the ? broke
!!        compilation. Follow this!

"Delete compound tags at the beginning of words"
Vw:0  <=>  [ # | #: ]  _  ; where Vw in RemWICmptag;



"Add +G3 tag once after +N tag"
0:%+G3  <=>  %+G3:0  [ %+N | %+N:%+N%* ]   _    [ \0:%+G3 | # | #: ]  ;
!! Will \0:%+G3 also match end-of-word? (In that case we can remove the disjunction)

"Remove +G3 tag before +N tag"
%+G3:0  <=>     _    [ %+N | %+N:%+N%* ]  ; 
!! We may have %+N:%+N%* there due to the below rule





!! Starring is commented out until we figure out a way to remove the
!! stars again:

! "Add stars to tags that appear before a compound border"
! Unstarred:Starred  <=>  _ [ Unstarred:Starred ]* (0:%+G3 [ Unstarred:Starred ]*)  %#  ;
!! The above rules may insert a +G3 after a starred N

"Never add stars (need to figure out a way to remove them before bidix first)"
Vu:Vs /<= _ ; where Vu in Unstarred Vs in Starred;
